Maryland, session 2025, HB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Cohabitant” means an individual who for a period of at least 180 days
in the year before the death of a fallen [law enforcement officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC
SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER:
(i) had a relationship of mutual interdependence with the fallen
[law enforcement officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL
OFFICER; and
(ii) resided with the fallen [law enforcement officer or rescue
worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER in the dwelling.
(3) “Disabled [law enforcement officer or rescue worker”] PUBLIC SAFETY
OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER” means an individual who:
– 1 –

Ch. 129 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) [is a law enforcement officer or rescue worker, as those terms are
defined, by law, by the county or municipal corporation as required under subsection (c) of
this section;
(ii)] has been found to be permanently and totally disabled by an
administrative body or court of competent jurisdiction authorized to make such a
determination; and
[(iii)] (II) became disabled:
1. as a result of or in the course of employment as a law
enforcement officer [or], a correctional officer, OR A JUDICIAL OFFICER; or
2. while in ACTIVE SERVICE AS A JUDICIAL OFFICER OR
WHILE IN the active service of a fire, rescue, or emergency medical service, unless the
disability was the result of the individual’s own willful misconduct or abuse of alcohol or
drugs.
(4) (i) “Dwelling” means real property that:
1. is the legal residence of a disabled [law enforcement officer
or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER, a surviving spouse,
or a cohabitant; and
2. is occupied by not more than two families.
(ii) “Dwelling” includes the lot or curtilage and structures necessary
to use the real property as a residence.
(5) “Fallen [law enforcement officer or rescue worker”] PUBLIC SAFETY
OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER” means an individual who dies:
(i) as a result of or in the course of employment as a law enforcement
officer [or], a correctional officer, OR A JUDICIAL OFFICER; or
(ii) while in ACTIVE SERVICE AS A JUDICIAL OFFICER OR WHILE
IN the active service of a fire, rescue, or emergency medical service, unless the death was
the result of the individual’s own willful misconduct or abuse of alcohol or drugs.
(6) “PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER” MEANS A CORRECTIONAL OFFICER, A
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, OR A MEMBER OF A FIRE, RESCUE, OR EMERGENCY
MEDICAL SERVICE, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED, BY LAW, BY THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
[(6)] (7) “Surviving spouse” means a surviving spouse, who has not
remarried, of a fallen [law enforcement officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER
OR JUDICIAL OFFICER.
(b) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or municipal corporation may grant, by law, a property tax credit under this section
against the county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on a dwelling that is
owned by a disabled [law enforcement officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER
OR JUDICIAL OFFICER, a surviving spouse [of a fallen law enforcement officer or rescue
worker], or a cohabitant:
(1) if the dwelling was owned by the disabled [law enforcement officer or
rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER at the time the [law
enforcement officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER
was adjudged to be permanently and totally disabled or by the fallen [law enforcement
officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER at the time of
the fallen [law enforcement officer’s or rescue worker’s] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER’S OR
JUDICIAL OFFICER’S death;
(2) if the disabled [law enforcement officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC
SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER was domiciled in the State as of, or any time
within the 5 years before, the date the disabled [law enforcement officer or rescue worker]
PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER was adjudged to be permanently and
totally disabled or the fallen [law enforcement officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY
OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER, the surviving spouse, or the cohabitant was domiciled
in the State as of, or any time within the 5 years before, the date of the fallen [law
enforcement officer’s or rescue worker’s] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER’S OR JUDICIAL
OFFICER’S death and the dwelling was acquired by the disabled [law enforcement officer
or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER within 10 years of
the date the disabled [law enforcement officer or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER
OR JUDICIAL OFFICER was adjudged to be permanently and totally disabled or by the
surviving spouse or cohabitant within 10 years of the fallen [law enforcement officer’s or
rescue worker’s] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER’S OR JUDICIAL OFFICER’S death;
(3) if the dwelling was owned by the surviving spouse or cohabitant at the
time of the fallen [law enforcement officer’s or rescue worker’s] PUBLIC SAFETY
OFFICER’S OR JUDICIAL OFFICER’S death; or
(4) if the dwelling was acquired after the disabled [law enforcement officer
or rescue worker] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER OR JUDICIAL OFFICER, the surviving
spouse, or the cohabitant qualified for a credit for a former dwelling under item (1), (2), or
(3) of this subsection, to the extent of the previous credit.
(c) A county or municipal corporation:
– 3 –

Ch. 129 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) shall define, by law, who is a [law enforcement officer or rescue worker]:
(I) PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER; AND
(II) JUDICIAL OFFICER; and
(2) may provide, by law, for:
(i) the amount and duration of a property tax credit allowed under
this section;
(ii) any additional limitation to the number of years the dwelling was
acquired within the date of an adjudication of disability or death; and
(iii) any other provision necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be construed to apply retroactively and shall be applied to and
interpreted to affect all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2022.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –